Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1 General Provisions

Administrative rules and regulations.

General provisions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Revenue, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax Unit, Subject 560-2-2.

3-3-1.
Declaration of business of manufacturing, selling, and other dealings in alcoholic beverages as privilege subject to regulatory requirements.

The businesses of manufacturing, distributing, selling, handling, and otherwise dealing in or possessing alcoholic beverages are declared to be privileges in this state and not rights; however, such privileges shall not be exercised except in accordance with the licensing, regulatory, and revenue requirements of this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-501, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1118, § 2.

Law reviews.

For comment on Hornsby v. Allen, 326 F.2d 605 (5th Cir. 1964), overturning the mere privilege doctrine by applying due process requirement to liquor licensing, see 19 Mercer L. Rev. 250 (1968).

For article on local government law and liquor licensing, see 15 Ga. L. Rev. 1039 (1981).

For article, “Lawyers Who Represent Local Governments,” see 23 Ga. St. B. J. 58 (1987).

3-3-1.1.
Legislative intent; construction.

This title has been enacted pursuant to the authority granted to the state under the Twenty-first Amendment to the United States Constitution, the powers reserved to the state under the Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution, and the inherent powers of the state under the Constitution of the State of Georgia of 1983. It is the intent of the General Assembly that this title do all of the following:

Further regulate and control alcoholic beverage transactions in this state under the control and supervision of the commissioner;

Promote and assure the public’s interest in fair and efficient distribution and quality control of alcoholic beverages in this state;

Promote orderly marketing of alcoholic beverages;

Prevent unfair business practices, discrimination, and undue control of one segment of the alcoholic beverage industry by any other segment;

Foster vigorous and healthy competition in the alcoholic beverage industry;

Preserve and promote a robust, stable system of distribution of alcoholic beverages to the public;

Provide for an orderly system of public revenues by facilitating the collection and accountability of this state and local excise taxes;

Facilitate the collection of state and local revenue;

Promote the health, safety, and welfare of residents of this state by, among other purposes, ensuring that the commissioner shall be able to inspect and seize any alcoholic beverage shipped into, distributed, and sold throughout this state and ensuring that any such alcoholic beverage:

Has been registered for sale in this state with the commissioner;

Is not subject to a government mandated or supplier initiated recall;

Is not counterfeit;

Is labeled in conformance with applicable laws, rules, and regulations;

Can be tested by the commissioner or an agent assigned by the commissioner; and

Is not prohibited by this state; and

Promote and maintain a sound, stable, and viable three-tier system of distribution of alcoholic beverages to the public.

If any provision of this title or its application to any person or circumstance is determined by a court or other authority of competent jurisdiction to be invalid or unconstitutional, such provision shall be stricken and the remaining provisions shall be construed in accordance with the intent of the General Assembly to further limit rather than expand commerce in alcoholic beverages, and with respect to alcoholic beverages, the remaining provisions shall be construed to enhance strict regulatory control over the taxation, manufacture, distribution, and sale of alcoholic beverages through the three-tier regulatory system and the licensing laws imposed by this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-3-1.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 615, § 1A/HB 879.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective August 3, 2020.

3-3-2.
Powers of local governing authorities as to granting, refusal, suspension, or revocation of licenses generally; due process guidelines; fingerprints.

Except as otherwise provided for in this title, the manufacturing, distributing, and selling by wholesale or retail of alcoholic beverages shall not be conducted in any county or incorporated municipality of this state without a permit or license from the governing authority of the county or municipality. Each such local governing authority is given discretionary powers within the guidelines of due process set forth in this Code section as to the granting or refusal, suspension, or revocation of the permits or licenses; provided, however, that residency by an applicant within the city or county issuing the permit or license shall not be a requirement by the respective local governing authority if the applicant designates a resident of the city or county who shall be responsible for any matter relating to the license.

The granting or refusal and the suspension or revocation of the permits or licenses shall be in accordance with the following guidelines of due process:

The governing authority shall set forth ascertainable standards in the local licensing ordinance upon which all decisions pertaining to these permits or licenses shall be based;

All decisions approving, denying, suspending, or revoking the permits or licenses shall be in writing, with the reasons therefor stated, and shall be mailed or delivered to the applicant; and

Upon timely application, any applicant aggrieved by the decision of the governing authority regarding a permit or license shall be afforded a hearing with an opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine opposing witnesses.

As a prerequisite to the issuance of any such initial permit or license only, the applicant shall furnish a complete set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, which shall search the files of the Georgia Crime Information Center for any instance of criminal activity during the two years immediately preceding the date of the application. The Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall also submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation under the rules established by the United States Department of Justice for processing and identification of records. The federal record, if any, shall be obtained and returned to the governing authority submitting the fingerprints.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 73, § 15A; Ga. L. 1973, p. 12, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 14, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-502, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 17; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1300, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 206, § 6/HB 1248.

Cross references.

Regulation of business of operating road houses, public dance halls, and other establishments by local governments, §

43-21-50

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules regulating the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Bureau of Investigation, Chapter 92-1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1986).

For comment on Hornsby v. Allen, 326 F.2d 605 (5th Cir. 1964), see 1 Ga. St. B. J. 550 (1965).

For comment, “Retail Liquor Licenses and Due Process: The Creation of Property Through Regulation,” see 32 Emory L.J. 1199 (1983).

3-3-2.1.
Notice to revenue department by county or municipality of violations concerning sale of alcoholic beverages to underage persons.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Disciplinary action” means any citation or arrest arising out of the violation of any law, rule, regulation, resolution, or ordinance of a governmental entity relating to the manufacture, distribution, sale, or possession of alcoholic beverages against a licensee, an employee of a licensee, or any person holding a financial interest in the license of the licensee on the premises or place of business of any licensee.

“Governmental entity” means the United States government, any state government, any local government, and any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof.

“Licensee” means any person issued a license pursuant to this title by a governmental entity to operate a bar.

Within 45 days of any disciplinary action, the licensee shall notify the department of the details of such disciplinary action, including the date such action was taken, the nature of such action, and any other information required by the department, using a format to be determined by the department.

The commissioner may impose a fine not to exceed $750.00 for each violation of paragraph (1) of this subsection. A second or subsequent violation of paragraph (1) of this subsection which occurs within three years from the date of the first violation may constitute grounds for the suspension, revocation, or cancellation of such person’s license.

Every county or municipality which issues licenses to a licensee authorizing the manufacture, distribution, or sale of alcoholic beverages shall by resolution or ordinance adopt a policy and implement a process by which any disciplinary action against a licensee shall be reported to the department within 45 days of any officer, department, agency, or instrumentality of such county or municipality taking such disciplinary action.

The commissioner shall determine and make available the format for the reporting of disciplinary actions and shall promulgate rules and regulations as to the implementation and use of such reporting method.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-3-2.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1398, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 578, § 2/HB 152; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 3/HB 737.

3-3-2.2.
Maximum fine for violations of local alcoholic beverages licensing ordinances.

Notwithstanding the limitations imposed by subparagraph (a)(2)(C) of Code Section 36-35-6 or any other provision of general law, in the case of a county or municipality which issues more than 300 licenses for consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises, the maximum fine for violations of local alcoholic beverages licensing ordinances referenced in Code Section 3-3-2 pertaining to licenses issued to sell alcoholic beverages by the drink for consumption on the premises shall be $2,500.00. Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the governing authority of a county or municipality from imposing a penalty that is otherwise allowed by law, unless such law is a local law in conflict with this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-3-2.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 874, § 1/HB 1501.

3-3-3.
Licenses required to distribute, sell, or otherwise deal in alcoholic beverages; display of licenses.

No person shall manufacture, distribute, sell, handle, or possess for sale, or otherwise deal in, alcoholic beverages without first obtaining all applicable licenses required by this title.

Each person holding a license issued pursuant to this title shall display the license prominently at all times on the premises for which the license is issued.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-503, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1118, § 3.

3-3-4.
Exemptions from license fees or taxes.

There shall be no exception from the license fees or taxes provided by this title in favor of any person unless specifically provided for by law.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-504, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-3-5.
Sale of alcoholic beverages not complying with federal requirements as to quality or purity or standards adopted by commissioner.

No alcoholic beverages shall be sold by any licensee under this title if the alcoholic beverages do not fully meet all federal requirements as to quality or purity, as represented by the label, or do not meet such standards as may be adopted by the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 26; Code 1933, § 5A-505, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-3-6.
Maintenance of records as to manufacture, purchase, or sale of alcoholic beverages by manufacturers, importers, or dealers; disposal of records.

Each manufacturer, importer, wholesale dealer, retail dealer, and retail consumption dealer shall keep and preserve, as prescribed by the commissioner, records of all alcoholic beverages manufactured, purchased, or sold by him. The records shall be kept for a period of three years from the date of manufacture, purchase, or sale and shall at all times be open to inspection by the commissioner or any authorized agent or employee of the commissioner.

The commissioner may authorize by rule the disposal of records maintained pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, prior to the expiration of the specified three-year period, when he is satisfied as to their contents or otherwise determines that the maintenance of the records is no longer necessary.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 73, § 6; Code 1933, § 58-822, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-506, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 18.